Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2502.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 3323(c.1) of Title 23 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 3323. Decree of court.* * *(c.1) Bifurcation.--[With](1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), with the consent of both parties, the court may enter a decree of divorce or annulment prior to the final determination and disposition of the matters provided for in subsection (b) if the court determines that doing so provides sufficient economic protections for any minor children of the marriage. In the absence of the consent of both parties, the court may enter a decree of divorce or annulment prior to the final 123456789101112131415161718 determination and disposition of the matters provided for in subsection (b) if:[(1) grounds have been established as provided in subsection (g); and(2) the moving party has demonstrated that:(i) compelling circumstances exist for the entry of the decree of divorce or annulment; and(ii) sufficient economic protections have been provided for the other party and any minor children of the marriage during the pendency of the disposition of the matters provided for in subsection (b).](i) grounds have been established as provided in subsection (g); and(ii) the moving party has demonstrated that:(A) compelling circumstances exist for the entry of the decree of divorce or annulment; and(B) sufficient economic protections have been provided for the other party and any minor children of the marriage during the pendency of the disposition of the matters provided for in subsection (b).(2) N otwithstanding paragraph (1), the court shall have the authority to enter a decree of divorce or annulment prior to the final determination and disposition of all claims raised in the complaint without the consent of both parties and without a showing of compelling circumstances if any of the following apply:(i) A valid protection from abuse order has been entered under Chapter 61 (relating to protection from abuse) in which one party is the defendant and the other 20260HB2502PN3388 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 party is the plaintiff.(ii) A party has been charged with or convicted of a personal injury crime, as defined in section 103 of the act of November 24, 1998 (P.L.882, No.111), known as the Crime Victims Act, against the other party. * * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2502PN3388 - 3 - 1234567